Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF490.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1075YH (2) 91 da/ns H.F. 490 Section 1. Section 147A.8, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. Provide veterinary medical services by 3 diagnosing or treating a severely injured police service dog 4 as provided in section 169.4. 5 Sec. 2. Section 169.4, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 6 following new subsection: 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 17. a. An emergency medical care provider 8 certified pursuant to chapter 147A who elects to provide 9 veterinary medical services by diagnosing or treating a police 10 service dog, if all of the following apply: 11 (1) The police service dog was on duty under the supervision 12 of a peace officer as defined in section 801.4. 13 (2) The police service dog suffered a severe injury. 14 (3) The veterinary medical services are necessary to 15 immediately stabilize the police service dogâs condition for 16 later diagnosis or treatment by a licensed veterinarian or the 17 holder of a valid temporary permit. 18 b. An emergency medical care provider certified pursuant 19 to chapter 147A may elect not to provide veterinary medical 20 services under paragraph âaâ . 21 c. If an emergency medical care provider certified pursuant 22 to chapter 147A elects to provide veterinary medical services 23 under paragraph âaâ , the emergency medical care provider shall 24 not be civilly liable for diagnosing or treating the police 25 service dog if the emergency medical care provider acted 26 reasonably and in good faith. 27 d. An emergency medical care provider certified pursuant to 28 chapter 147A electing to provide veterinary medical services 29 under paragraph âaâ shall comply with all of the following: 30 (1) The emergency medical care provider may diagnose 31 or treat a severely injured police service dog only after 32 the emergency medical care provider furnishes all diagnoses 33 or treatment needed by the last human at the scene of the 34 emergency. 35 -1- LSB 1075YH (2) 91 da/ns 1/ 3 H.F. 490 (2) The emergency medical care provider shall not use 1 equipment, or shall discontinue the use of equipment, to 2 diagnose or treat a severely injured police service dog at the 3 scene of an emergency, if any of the following apply: 4 (a) The equipment is needed to diagnose or treat a human at 5 the scene of the emergency. 6 (b) The equipment is dispatched to another location. 7 (3) The emergency medical care provider shall not diagnose 8 or treat a severely injured police service dog, or shall 9 discontinue diagnosing or treating a severely injured police 10 service dog, at the scene of an emergency, if any of the 11 following apply: 12 (a) The emergency medical care provider is dispatched to 13 another location. 14 (b) A vehicle used to transport the emergency medical care 15 provider is dispatched to another location. 16 e. A severely injured police service dog shall not be 17 transported in a vehicle that provides emergency medical or 18 ambulance services. 19